Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 418.036 is amended to read:
418.036. On or before November 1 of each even-numbered year, the Department of Human Ser-
vices  shall  develop and submit a report to the appropriate legislative interim committees dealing
with child welfare matters. The  report [ shall] must be disaggregated by race,  cover the prior
24-month period and [ shall] include, but need not be limited to:
(1) The number of children in foster care;
(2) The number of children that have had more than one foster care placement;
(3) The number of placements for each child described in subsection (2) of this section;
(4) The percentage of foster children placed apart from siblings;
(5) The number of placement changes experienced by foster children;
(6) The number and percentage of children placed with relatives; [ and]
(7) The department’s Status of Children in Oregon’s Child Protection System annual report[ .];
(8) The number and percentage of foster  children of one or more parents whose parental
rights have been terminated;
(9) The number and percentage of foster children who spent  at least one night in con-
gregate care;
(10) The number and percentage  of foster children who spent at least one night placed
in temporary lodging;
(11) The number and percentage  of foster children who spent more than seven nights
placed in temporary lodging;
(12) The number and percentage of dual system involved foster children; and
(13) The average length of time a  foster child spent in foster care, disaggregated by
county.
Enrolled House Bill 3003 (HB 3003-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by House March 25, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 1, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3003 (HB 3003-INTRO) Page 2